en: Nozzle types included: Dual; Flat; Round; Sausage; Snack stick; Strip; Other
pt-PT: Tipos de bocal incluídos: Duplo; Liso; Redondo; Salsicha; Snack stick; Faixa; Outro
lt-LT: Komplekte esantys purkštukų tipai: Dvigubas; Plokščias; Apvalus; Dešrelės formos; Užkandžių lazdelė; Juosta; Kita
zh-CN: 包括的喷嘴类型: 双头; 平口; 圆形; 香肠型; 吸嘴零食棒; 条形; 其他
pl: Typy dysz w zestawie: Podwójne; Płaskie; Okrągłe; Do kiełbasy; Końcówka do paluszków; Szczelinowe; Pozostałe
ko: 포함 노즐 유형: 듀얼; 플랫; 라운드; 소세지; 스낵 스틱; 조각; 기타
nl: Inbegrepen sproeiertypen: Dubbel; Vlak; Rond; Worst; Snackstick; Strip; Overig
zh-TW: 包含噴嘴類型: 雙重; 平頂; 圓形; 香腸; 零食棒; 直條; 其他
hr-HR: Uključene vrste mlaznice: Dvostruka; Ravna; Okrugla; Kobasica; Za tanke kobasice; Traka; Ostalo
bg-BG: Включени видове дюзи: Двойно; Плоско; Кръгло; Продълговато; За тънки наденички; Лентово; Друго
sv: Munstyckstyper som ingår: Dubbel; Platt; Rund; Korv; Snackstick; Remsa; Övrigt
sk-SK: Typy trysiek v balení: Dvojitá; Plochá; Okrúhla; Valcová; Úzka dýza; Strip; Iné
ja: 付属ノズルの種類: デュアル; フラット; ラウンド; ソーセージ; スナックスティック; ストリップ; その他
it: Tipi di ugelli inclusi: Doppie; Piatto; Rotondo; Per salsicce; Bastoncino da spuntino; Nastro; Altro
cs: Zahrnuté typy trysek: Dvojitá tryska; Plochá tryska; Kruhová tryska; Aplikační tryska; Na masové tyčinky; Pásmová tryska; Jiné
ru: Виды насадок в комплекте: Двойная; Плоская; Круглая; Колбасная; Палочка для перекуса; Ленточная; Другая
da: Dysetyper, som følger med: Dobbelt; Flad; Rund; Pølse; Snackstick; Strip; Andet
ro-RO: Tipuri de duze incluse: Dublu; Plat; Rotund; Adaptor pentru cârnați; Bețișor pentru gustări; Bandă; Altele
th: ประเภทของหัวฉีดที่ให้มา: คู่; เรียบ; ทรงกลม; ไส้กรอก; หัวบีบทรงแท่ง; แถบ; อื่นๆ
de: Inbegriffene Düsentypen: Zwei; Flach; Kreis; Wurst; Sprühdrüse; Streifen; Sonstiges
vi: Các loại vòi phun đi kèm: Kép; Phẳng; Tròn; Hình xúc xích; Que ăn nhẹ; Dải; Khác
fi: Mukana toimitettavat suutintyypit: Kaksiosainen; Tasainen; Pyöreä; Makkara; Napostelumakkara; Liuska; Muu
hu: Tartozék fúvókatípusok: Kettős; Lapos; Kerek; Kolbásztöltő; Snackpálcika; Cső; Egyéb
nb: Dysetyper inkludert: Dobbel; Flat; Rund; Pølse; Snackpinne; Stripe; Annet
tr: Dahil edilen nozul tipleri: Çift; Düz; Yuvarlak; Sosis; Atıştırmalık çubuk ucu; Şerit; Diğer
es: Tipos de boquillas incluidas: Doble; Plano; Redondo; Salchicha; Palitos de picoteo; Banda; Otros
el: Τύποι ακροφυσίων που περιλαμβάνονται: Διπλό; Επίπεδο; Στρογγυλό; Για λουκάνικα; Σνακ στικ; Λωρίδων; Άλλο
sl-SI: Priložene vrste šob: Dvojno; Ploščata; Okrogel; Klobasa; Palčka za prigrizek; Trak; Druga
pt-BR: Tipos de bico incluídos: Dual; Plano; Redondo; Salsicha; Palitos de lanche; Faixa; Outro
fr: Types de buses incluses: Double; Plat; Rond; Saucisse; Bâtonnet snack; Bande; Autre